Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1218] Failure to maintain age
verification records of sexual performers. (1) A person commits the
offense of failure to maintain age verification records of sexual performers if
the person knowingly produces any pornographic performance, book, magazine,
periodical, film, videotape, computer image, or other matter that contains one
or more pornographic visual depictions made after June 30, 2002, of sexual
conduct and:

(a) Knowingly fails to create and maintain age
verification records for each sexual performer;

(b) Knowingly makes or causes to be made any false
entry into the age verification records of sexual performers required by this
section; or

(c) Knowingly fails to produce the age verification
records of sexual performers required by this section, upon request by a law
enforcement officer for the purpose of verifying the age of a sexual performer.

(2) Failure to maintain age verification
records of sexual performers is a class C felony. [L 2002, c 240, pt of §3]

COMMENTARY ON §712-1218

Act 240, Session Laws 2002, added this section to establish
criminal penalties against those who participate in or profit from the sexual
exploitation of a minor.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next